North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-35 Water Districts
61-35-59.
Voting on proposed projects.

At the hearing, the affected landowners and any county, township, or city to be assessed must be informed when and where votes concerning the proposed project may be filed. Affected landowners and the governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed have thirty days after the date of the hearing to file their votes with the secretary of the district. Once the deadline for filing votes has been reached, no more votes may be filed and no person may withdraw a vote. Any withdrawal of a vote concerning the proposed project before that time must be in writing. When the votes have been filed and the deadline for filing votes has passed, the board shall immediately determine whether the project is approved. If the board finds that fifty percent or more of the total votes filed are against the proposed project, then the vote constitutes a bar against proceeding further with the project. If the board finds that the number of votes filed against the proposed project is less than fifty percent of the votes filed, the board shall issue an order establishing the proposed project and may proceed, after complying with the requirements of sections 61-35-62 and 61-35-63, to contract or provide for the construction or maintenance of the project in substantially the manner and according to the forms and procedure provided in sections 61-35-88 through 61-35-103. The board may enter into any agreement with any federal or state agency under the terms of which the contract for the project is to be let by the federal agency, the state agency, or a combination thereof. In projects where there is an agreement that a party other than the board will let the contract, the board may dispense with all of the requirements of sections 61-35-88 through 61-35-103. Upon making an order establishing or denying establishment of a project, the board shall publish notice of the order in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the affected landowners reside and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. Any right of appeal begins to run on the date of publication of the notice.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-60.
Voting right or powers of landowners.

In order that there may be a fair relationship between the amount of liability for assessments and the power of objecting to the establishment of a proposed project, the voting rights of affected landowners on the question of establishing the project are as provided in this section. The landowner of land affected by the project has one vote for each dollar of assessment to which the land is subject or one vote for each dollar of the assessed valuation of land condemned for the project, as determined in accordance with title 57. The governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed has one vote for each dollar of assessment against such county, township, or city. There may be only one vote for each dollar of assessment, regardless of the number of owners of a tract of land. If more than one owner of a tract of land exists, the votes must be prorated among them in accordance with each owner’s property interest. A written power of attorney authorizes an agent to protest a project on behalf of any affected landowner or landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-61.
Assessment of cost of project.

When the district board proposes to make any special assessment under this chapter, the board, prior to the hearing required under section 61-35-58 shall inspect any and all lots and parcels of land that may be subject to assessment and shall determine from the inspection the particular lots and parcels of lands which, in the opinion of the board, will be especially benefited by the construction of the work for which the assessment is made and shall assess the proportion of the total cost of acquiring right of way and constructing and maintaining such improvement in accordance with benefits received but not exceeding such benefits, against:

Any county, township, or city, in its corporate capacity, which may be directly or indirectly benefited by the improvement.

Any lot, piece, or parcel of land that is directly benefited by the improvement.

In determining benefits, the board shall consider, among other factors, property values, degree of improvement of properties, and productivity. Property belonging to the United States is exempt from assessment unless the United States has provided for the payment of any assessment that may be levied against its property for benefits received. Benefited property belonging to the state, a county, a city, a school district, a park district, or a township is not exempt from assessment and political subdivisions that own assessed property shall provide for the payment of such assessments, including installments and interest, by the levy of taxes according to law. Any county, township, or city assessed in its corporate capacity for benefits received shall provide for the payment of those assessments, installments, and interest from its general fund or by levy of a general property tax against all the taxable property in the political subdivision in accordance with law. No tax limitation provided by any statute of this state applies to tax levies made by any political subdivision for paying any special assessments made under this chapter. There must be attached to the list of assessments a certificate signed by a majority of the members of the board certifying that it is a true and correct assessment of the benefit described to the best of their judgment and stating the several items of expense included in the assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-62.
Assessment list to be published — Notice of hearing — Alteration of assessments — Confirmation of assessment list — Filing.

After entering an order establishing the project, the district board shall cause the assessment list to be published once each week for two successive weeks in the newspapers of general circulation in the district and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. The publication must include a notice of the time and place the board will meet to hear objections to any assessment by any interested party, or an agent or attorney for that party. The date set for the hearing must be not less than twenty days after the first publication of the notice. At the hearing, the board may make such alterations in the assessments as in its opinion may be just and necessary to correct any error in the assessment but must make the aggregate of all assessments equal to the total amount required to pay the entire cost of the work for which the assessments are made or the part of the cost to be paid by special assessment. An assessment may not exceed the benefit as determined by the board to the parcel of land or political subdivision assessed. The board shall then confirm the assessment list and the secretary shall attach to the list a certificate that it is correct as confirmed by the board. The secretary shall file the list in the office of the district secretary.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-63.
Appeal to department of water resources.

Within ten days after the hearing under section 61-35-62, affected landowners and any political subdivision subject to assessment, having not less than twenty-five percent of the possible votes as determined under section 61-35-60, who believe that the assessment has not been fairly or equitably made, or that the project is not properly located or designed, may appeal to the department of water resources by petition, to review the assessments and examine the location and design of the proposed project. Upon receipt of a petition, the department shall examine the lands assessed and the location and design of the proposed project, and if it appears that the assessments have not been made equitably, the department may correct the assessments, and the department’s correction and adjustment of assessments is final. If it appears to the department the project has been located or designed improperly, the department may order a relocation and redesign, which must be followed in the construction of the proposed project. Upon filing a bond for two hundred fifty dollars with the board for the payment of the costs of the department in the matter, any landowner or political subdivision claiming to receive no benefit from the project may appeal to the department the question of whether there is any benefit. The appeal must be filed with the department within ten days after the hearing on assessments in section 61-35-62. The department may not determine the specific amount of benefit upon an appeal by an individual landowner or political subdivision but may determine only if there is any benefit to the landowner or political subdivision. The determination of the department upon the appeal is final.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 211, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-64.
When assessments may be made.

After the requirements of this chapter have been satisfied and a contract and bond for any work for which a special assessment is to be levied have been approved by the district board, the board may direct special assessments to be levied for the payment of appropriate costs and the secretary shall certify to the board the items of total cost to be paid by special assessments so far as they have been ascertained. The certificate must include the estimated construction cost under the terms of any contract, a reasonable allowance for cost of extra work that may be authorized under the plans and specifications, acquisition of right of way, engineering, fiscal agents’ and attorney’s fees for any services in connection with the authorization and financing of the improvement, cost of publication of required notices, printing of improvement bonds, cost necessarily paid for damages caused by such improvement, interest during the construction period, and all expenses incurred in making the improvement and levy of assessments.

A contract or contracts may not be awarded which exceed, by forty percent or more, the estimated cost of the project as presented to and approved by the affected landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-65.
Reassessment of benefits.

The district board may hold at any time or, upon petition of any affected landowner or political subdivision which has been assessed after a project has been in existence for at least one year, shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the benefits of the project to each tract of land affected. At least ten days’ notice of the hearing must be given by publication in the newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the district and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located and by mailing notice by ordinary mail to each owner of land whose assessment is proposed to be raised as determined by the records of the recorder or county treasurer. The provisions of this chapter governing the original determination of benefits and assessment of costs apply to any reassessment of benefits carried out under this section. The board may not be forced to make a reassessment more than once every ten years. Any assessment or balance of an assessment supporting a project fund may not be reduced or impaired by reassessment or otherwise so long as bonds payable out of such fund remain unpaid and moneys are not available in such fund to pay all such bonds in full, with interest. Costs of maintenance must be prorated in accordance with any plan for reassessment of benefits that has been adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-35-66.
Correction of errors and mistakes in special assessments — Requirements governing.

If mathematical errors or other mistakes occur in making any assessment resulting in a deficiency in that assessment, the district board shall cause additional assessments to be made in a manner substantially complying with chapter 40-26 as it relates to special assessments.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-67.
Lien of special assessment.

A special assessment imposed by a district, with accrued interest and penalties, is a lien upon the property on which the assessment is levied from the time the assessment list is approved by the district board until the assessment is fully paid. The liens have precedence over all other liens except general tax liens and may not be divested by any judicial sale. Mistake in the description of the property covered by the special assessment lien or in the name of the owner of such property does not defeat the lien if the assessed property can be identified by the description in the assessment list. This chapter must be considered notice to all subsequent encumbrances of the priority of special assessments imposed under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-68.
Sewer or water improvements in districts may be paid for by service charges.

A district constructing a sewer or water improvement under the special assessment method may resolve in the resolution or ordinance required by section 61-35-52, that a portion of the cost of the improvement must be raised by service charges for the use of the improvement and of the utility of which it forms a part. If the district so resolves, it may determine in its resolutions, ordinances, and other proceedings relating to the levying of special assessments and the issuing of bonds to pay the cost of such improvement, that a specified portion or all of such cost must be assessed specially against any property specially benefited and may cause to be assessed only the portion so determined. In that event the entire remainder of the cost, including interest as well as principal of any bonds issued, over and above the amount of special assessments actually collected and received from time to time in the fund of the improvement district, must be paid from the net revenues derived from the service charges. All of the applicable provisions of this chapter relating to special assessments are applicable to such improvements except as to the portion of the cost of improvements resolved or ordained to be paid by service charges. The board of the district shall provide for the establishment, imposition, and collection of service charges for the services furnished by the improvement and the utility of which it forms a part, and in that connection it has all the rights and powers respecting such service charges as it would have with respect to like matters if the improvement were made in accordance with chapter 40-35. The net revenues derived from the imposition and collection of the service charges or any portion of the service charges as are determined by the board in the resolutions and ordinances must be paid into the appropriate improvement district funds created under section 61-35-83. The revenues when collected must be used and applied in the same manner as moneys paid into such funds from the collection of special assessments. The board of any district issuing bonds to finance any such improvement, in its resolutions and ordinances, may establish an assessment reserve in the fund of the improvement district, to which it may appropriate net revenues of the utility or system from time to time received in excess of amounts required, with special assessments then on hand, to meet the principal and interest next due on the bonds. Before November first of any year the district may by resolution determine the proportion which the amount then on hand in the assessment reserve, and irrevocably appropriated to the payment of the bond, bears to the aggregate amount of the installment of the special assessments levied for the improvement which is payable in the following year, including interest. The district may direct the auditor to reduce, by not more than a proportionate amount, the total of that installment and interest which would otherwise be placed upon the tax list of the district for the current year, against each lot and tract of land assessed or taxed for improvement. If the installment of the special assessment on any property has been prepaid, the board may direct the district to refund, out of the assessment reserve, to the owner of the property at the time of the refund as indicated in the records of the recorder of the county, a sum not exceeding a similar proportion of the principal amount of such installment, excluding interest.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-35-69.
Abbreviations, letters, or figures may be used in proceedings for levy and collection of special assessments.

In all proceedings for the levy and collection of special assessments, abbreviations, letters, and figures may be used to denote all or parts of additions, lots, lands, blocks, sections, townships, ranges, years, days of the month, and amounts of money.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-70.
District office to keep complete record of improvements — Record as evidence.

The district office shall keep a complete record of all the proceedings taken in the matter of making any improvements under this chapter. The record must include all reports and confirmations, all petitions, orders, notices and proofs of publication, and resolutions of the board. The record, a certified transcript of the record, or the original papers, proofs of publications, orders, or resolutions on file in the office must be admitted in evidence in any court or place in this state without further proof as evidence of the facts in those documents.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-71.
Defects and irregularities in improvement proceedings are not fatal.

Defects and irregularities in any proceedings had or to be had under this chapter relating to district improvements by the special assessment method, if the proceedings are for a lawful purpose and are unaffected by fraud and do not violate any constitutional limitation or restriction, do not invalidate the proceedings, and no action may be commenced or maintained and no defense or counterclaim in any action may be recognized in the courts of this state founded on any such defects or irregularities in the proceedings, unless commenced within thirty days of the adoption of the resolution of the board awarding the sale of bonds to finance the improvement.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-72.
Payment of special assessments — Interest.

All special assessments levied under this title may be paid without interest within ten days after they have been approved by the board and thereafter bear interest at an annual rate not exceeding one and one-half percentage points above the average net annual interest rate on any bonds for the payment of which they are pledged on the total amount remaining unpaid.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-73.
Lien between vendor and vendee of special assessments.

As between a vendor and vendee of real property, unless the purchase contract otherwise provides, the installments of all special assessments for local improvements which are required to be certified and returned to the county auditor in each year become a lien upon the real property upon which they are assessed from and after the first day of December in that year.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-74.
Sewer special assessments extended over a period of not more than thirty years.

Special assessments for the payment of the cost of constructing any sewer are payable in equal annual amounts, or in such annual amounts as will permit the annual increase in payment of principal to approximate the annual decrease in the interest on amounts remaining unpaid, extending over a period of not exceeding thirty years as the board may fix by ordinance or resolution.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-75.
Water main and waterworks special assessments extended over a period of not more than thirty years.

Special assessments for the payment of the cost of constructing or laying any water mains or constructing any waterworks are payable in equal annual amounts, or in such annual amounts as will permit the annual increase in payment of principal to approximate the annual decrease in the interest on amounts remaining unpaid, extending over a period of not more than thirty years as the board may fix by ordinance or resolution.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-76.
Payments in full of assessments — Payments to county treasurer or district treasurer — Receipts.

The owner of any property against which an assessment has been made under this title for the cost of any improvement may pay in full or in part the amount remaining unpaid and the unpaid accumulated interest. The payment in full discharges the lien of the assessment upon that property. The payment may be made to the county treasurer upon all installments of the assessments which have been certified to the county auditor, and may be made to the district treasurer upon all portions of the assessment which have not been certified. Any person desiring to pay any portion of the assessment to the district treasurer shall obtain from the district treasurer a certificate of the amount due upon the assessment which has not been certified to the county auditor and shall present the certificate to the district treasurer. The district treasurer shall receive and collect that amount and issue a receipt to the person paying the assessment. The district treasurer shall note upon the treasurer’s records the payment of the assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-77.
Certification of assessments to county auditor.

When a district board, by resolution, has caused special assessments to be levied to cover the cost of constructing a project, the board shall determine the rate of interest unpaid special assessments are to bear, which rate may not exceed one and one-half percent above the bond rate. Interest on unpaid special assessments commences on the date the assessments are finally confirmed by the board. Special assessments may be certified and made payable in equal annual installments, the last of which must be due and payable not more than thirty years after date of the bonds to be paid. The secretary of the district shall certify to the county auditor of the county in which the district is situated, or if the district embraces more than one county, to the county auditor of each county in which district lands subject to such special assessments are situated, the total amount assessed against each piece, parcel, lot, or tract of land. The secretary of the district shall also file with the county auditor of each county in which district lands lie a statement showing the cost of the project and the part of the project to be financed by special assessments. Funds needed to pay the cost of maintaining a project may be raised in the same manner as funds were raised to meet construction costs. If the project was financed in whole or in part through the use of special assessments, the district board shall prorate the cost of construction or, if a reassessment of benefits has been adopted, the costs must be prorated in accordance with the reassessment of benefits as authorized by section 61-35-65. The district treasurer shall annually certify to the county auditor all uncertified installments of assessments which are to be extended upon the tax lists of the district for the current year, in the manner provided in this section. The annual certification must continue until the amount of moneys on deposit in the fund established under section 61-35-83 is sufficient to cover outstanding principal of and interest on any obligations issued to fund the projects, and in addition, to repay the district for any payments made by the district to fund deficiencies in the fund established under section 61-35-83.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-78.
District treasurer to insert amount of improvements in county real estate book or other forms — Regulations governing.

The district treasurer shall notify the county auditor not later than August twentieth in each year of any special assessments that were made in the district in addition to those reported in the previous year. The county auditor shall make and deliver to the district treasurer on or before September twentieth each year a copy of the real estate assessment book or other forms for the current year covering all additions in which any special assessments have existed and where any will appear for the current year as advised by the district treasurer. The district treasurer shall insert in the proper columns under the appropriate headings the amount of each of the installments of the assessments on the lots or subdivisions of lots or tracts of land which are to be extended upon the tax lists of the district for the current year. The district treasurer shall show the total amount of special assessments certified to the county auditor for the current year. If a division of property has been made since the original assessment, the district treasurer shall make or cause to be made the proper division of the special assessments on the lots or tracts of land in the same manner as general taxes are divided and assessed as furnished by the county auditor. The district treasurer shall certify the special assessments to the county auditor by November first of each year.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-79.
Extension of special assessments on tax lists — Collection — Payment over to district.

The county auditor shall extend the special assessments upon the tax lists of the district for the current year and the assessments with interest and penalties must be collected as general taxes are collected and paid over to the district treasurer and shall be placed by the district treasurer in the respective funds for which they were collected.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-80.
Special assessment record book kept by county auditor — Assessments certified for more than one year.

The county auditor shall keep a special assessment record. When any district causes the installments of special assessments for a period of more than one year to be certified, the county auditor shall cause the certified special assessments to be recorded for the respective years and in the amounts shown in the certificate of the district treasurer. The certificate of the district treasurer must include a list of all lots and tracts of land upon which such assessments are levied, designating the purpose of the assessment, the fund to which it belongs, and the installment of such assessment for each year against each lot or tract, including interest.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-81.
County treasurer to certify and receipt for amount of special assessments collected — Contents of certificate — Procedure for abatement.

Special assessments of any kind certified to the county auditor by the district treasurer must be paid to the county treasurer and included in the receipt required by section 57-20-08. If the county treasurer receives less than the full amount of taxes and special assessments due at any time on any lot or tract of real estate, the county treasurer shall allocate the amount of such payment between taxes and special assessments in proportion to the respective amounts of taxes and special assessments which are then due. When prorating any tax payment received before October fifteenth, the term “due”, as it pertains to real estate taxes, includes only the first installment of real estate taxes. Special assessments are not subject to abatement or refund by proceedings under chapter 57-32 but may be reviewed and corrected only in the manner and upon the conditions provided in chapter 40-26. The county treasurer, at the time set by law for the payment to the district treasurer of all the taxes and special assessments collected during the preceding month, shall certify the amounts of special assessments collected. The certificate must state specifically the lot or known subdivision as it appears on the tax books of the county treasurer, and the block, addition, amount collected, and amount credited to each lot or known subdivision, and the year for which the sum was collected. The certificate must be furnished to the district treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-82.
Interest and penalties added to special assessments — County treasurer to collect and pay over.

The county treasurer shall add to all special assessments the same interest and penalties that are added in the case of general taxes and at the same time. The county treasurer shall collect the interest and penalties with the special assessments and shall pay all such interest and penalties collected over to the district treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-83.
Special improvement moneys to be kept separate — Designation and numbering of funds — Diversion of moneys prohibited.

All special assessments and taxes levied and other revenues pledged under the provisions of this chapter to pay the cost of an improvement constitute a fund for the payment of that cost, including all principal of and interest on bonds and other obligations issued by the district to finance the improvement, and may be diverted to no other purpose. The district treasurer shall hold all moneys received for any such fund as a special fund to be applied to payment for the improvement. Each fund must be designated by the name and number of the improvement district in or for which the special assessments, taxes, and revenues are collected. When all principal and interest on bonds and other obligations of the fund have been fully paid, all moneys remaining in a fund may be transferred into the general fund of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-84.
Bonds — When payable — Amounts — Interest.

At any time after entering into a contract for a project to be financed in whole or in part by special assessments, a district may issue temporary and definitive bonds on the project fund, created for that purpose, in the manner and subject to the limitations prescribed in section 40-24-19. If the bonds are issued to finance a sewer or water project, the net revenues derived from the imposition of service charges to be imposed and collected with respect to the project as provided in section 61-35-68 may be pledged to payment of those bonds, except that the first maturity date of any such bond may not be less than two years from the date of issuance. Bonds issued under this section must be in amounts as in the judgment of the board will be necessary for the project. The bonds must bear interest at a rate or rates and be sold at a price resulting in an average net interest cost not exceeding twelve percent per annum if sold at private sale. There is no interest rate ceiling on bond issues sold at public sale or to the state or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. The bonds must state upon their face the purpose for which they are issued and the project fund from which they are payable and must be signed by the chairman of the board and countersigned by the secretary of the district. The bonds must be payable serially in such amounts as the board determines, extending over a period of not more than thirty years.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-85.
Bonds may be used in making payments on contract — Bonds payable out of fund on which drawn — May be used to pay special assessments.

Improvement bonds may be used in making payments on contracts for construction of the project for which the special assessment fund was created, or may be sold for cash at not less than ninety-eight percent of par and accrued interest, and the proceeds, less accrued interest, must be credited to the construction account of the fund and must be used exclusively to pay those contracts and construction costs. Any balance remaining in any construction account after completion of any project must be transferred to the sinking fund account of the assessment fund. The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment bonds as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund on which they are drawn and shall cancel the bonds when paid.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-86.
Refunding special assessment bonds — Purposes for which such bonds may be issued — Payment of bonds.

Any district having outstanding special assessment bonds, payable in whole or in part out of collections from special assessments, which are past due or which are redeemable, either at the option of the district or with the consent of the bondholders, may issue refunding special assessment bonds if there is not sufficient money in the project fund against which such bonds are drawn to pay the same. The issuance of refunding bonds must be authorized by resolution of the district board. The resolution must describe the bonds to be refunded and their amount and maturity. Refunding bonds may be issued for any of the following purposes:

To extend the maturities of bonds payable in whole or in part by special assessments.

To reduce the interest on the bonds.

Refunding bonds must bear such date, be in such date, be in such denominations, and mature serially within such time, not exceeding thirty years from date of issuance, as the board determines. The average rate of interest on the bonds may not exceed the average rate of interest on refunded bonds.

The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment bonds as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund against which they are drawn and shall cancel the bonds when paid. Any deficiency in any fund created for the payment of district bonds payable in whole or in part out of collections of special assessment taxes must be the general obligation of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-87.
Foreclosure of tax lien on property when general and special assessment taxes are delinquent.

Special assessments imposed under this chapter become due and delinquent and are subject to penalties for nonpayment at the same date and rates as first installments of real estate taxes at the same time and in the same manner as provided in title 57.

If there is no delinquent general property tax against a tract or parcel of land and it is foreclosed for special assessments alone, the notice of foreclosure of tax lien must state that the foreclosure is for special assessments and a tax deed in such case must be issued in the usual course of procedure.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1999, ch. 503, § 46.

61-35-88.
Call for bids — Contents — Advertising.

Proposals for the work of making improvements provided for in this chapter that exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02 must be advertised for by the board in the official newspaper of the county where the district office is located once each week for two consecutive weeks. The board may cause the work on two or more improvements to be combined in one advertisement and one contract awarded pursuant to that advertisement. The advertisement for bids must:

Specify the work to be done according to the plans and specifications on file in the office of the district;

Call for bids upon the basis of cash payment for the work;

State the time within which the bids will be received; and

State the time within which the work on the improvement is to be completed.

The board may require bidders to state also the rate of interest, not exceeding seven percent per annum, which the bonds to be received and accepted by the bidder at par in payment for the work are to bear.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2003, ch. 554, § 4; 2007, ch. 403, § 26.

61-35-89.
Bid to be accompanied by a bond — Bond retained upon failure of bidder to contract — Amount of bond.

Each bid for any work to be done under this chapter must be accompanied by a separate envelope containing a bidder’s bond in the amount of five percent of the amount of the bid, executed as provided in this chapter and running to the district that the bidder will enter into a contract for performance of the work in case a contract is awarded to the bidder. If any bidder to whom a contract is awarded fails or refuses to enter into the contract when requested to do so, the bond accompanying the bidder’s bid must be retained by the district as liquidated damages for the failure. The bond must be delivered to the district office and credited to the fund from which the consideration for the work is payable. The sufficiency of any bond filed by a bidder must be determined by the board at the time of considering bids.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-90.
Execution of bidder’s bond.

The bidder’s bond must be executed by the bidder as principal and may be provided by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety or by a bank letter of credit, a cash bond, or a certified check.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-91.
Conditions of bidder’s bond.

A bidder’s bond must be made payable to the district and conditioned that if the principal’s bid is accepted and the contract for the work of improvement awarded to the bidder, the bidder, within ten days after the acceptance of the bid, or within such further time as the board grants, will enter into and execute a contract bond in a sum equal to the amount of the bid, and a contract in writing to and with the district well and faithfully to perform and complete the work for which the bid was accepted, in accordance with the plans and specifications and the terms of the bid and within the time required by the terms of the contract, and that the bidder will pay for all the labor and materials used in such work. The bond must be for the benefit of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-92.
Bids — Filing — Sealing — Endorsing — Opening — Considering.

Bids for the work to be let under this chapter must be forwarded to the district office and must be sealed securely to prevent opening without detection. There must be endorsed upon the outside of the envelope containing the bid a statement of what work the proposal is for. The bids must be opened by the board at the expiration of the time limited in the advertisement for receiving the same, which may not be less than fifteen days after the first publication of the advertisement, or at such other time as the board may appoint. Only bids that are accompanied by the bond provided for in section 61-35-89 may be considered by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-93.
Opening of bids — Bids to be entered on minutes.

After the bids have been opened and made public, they must be entered upon the minutes of the meeting of the board of the district at which they are considered, and they must be preserved carefully by the district secretary.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.